Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2306
Employer; fine.

On and after October 1, 1998, the department may levy a fine not to exceed twenty-five dollars for each employee not reported by the employer to the department. The department shall determine whether or not to levy a fine based upon the good faith efforts of an employer to comply with the New Hire Reporting Act. The department shall remit fines collected under this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 220.